Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-11] Grounds for refusal to renew,
reinstate, or restore a license and for revocation, suspension, denial, or
condition of a license. (a) In addition to any other acts or conditions
provided by law, the director may refuse to renew, reinstate, or restore and
may deny, revoke, suspend, or condition in any manner any license for any one
or more of the following acts or conditions on the part of a licensee or
license applicant:

(1) Failure to meet or to maintain the conditions and
requirements necessary to qualify for the granting of a license;

(2) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, or making untruthful or improbable statements in advertising;

(3) Engaging in the practice of respiratory care
while impaired by alcohol, drugs, physical disability, or mental instability;

(4) Procuring a license to practice respiratory care
through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

(5) Aiding and abetting an unlicensed person to
directly or indirectly perform activities requiring a license to practice
respiratory care;

(6) Engaging in professional misconduct,
incompetence, gross negligence, or manifest incapacity in the practice of
respiratory care;

(7) Engaging in conduct or a practice contrary to
recognized standards of ethics for the practice of respiratory care;

(8) Violating any condition or limitation imposed on
a license to practice respiratory care by the director;

(9) Engaging in the practice of respiratory care in a
manner that causes injury to one or more members of the public;

(10) Failing to comply with, observe, or adhere to any
law in a manner that causes the director to determine that the applicant or
holder is unfit to hold a license;

(11) Having a license revoked or suspended or other
disciplinary action by any state or federal agency for any reason that is
provided by the applicable licensing laws or by this section;

(12) Having been convicted or pleaded nolo contendere
to a crime directly related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the
practice of respiratory care;

(13) Failing to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision issued against the licensee or applicant in another
jurisdiction within thirty days of the disciplinary decision;

(14) Employing, whether gratuitously or for pay, any
person not licensed pursuant to this chapter to perform the functions or duties
of the practice of respiratory care; or

(15) Violating this chapter, chapter 436B, or any rule
or order of the director.

(b) Any licensee or applicant who violates
this section may also be fined not more than $1,000 per violation, as
established by the director by rule. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next